Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1249.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The title and section 101 of the act of October 9, 2008 (P.L.1363, No.100), known as the Crane Operator 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829 Licensure Act, are amended to read:AN ACTRelating to crane operator licensure; establishing the State Board of Crane Operators and Well Drillers; conferring powers and imposing duties relative to regulating the practice of crane operation and well drilling; imposing penalties; and making an appropriation.Section 101. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Crane Operator and Well Driller Licensure Act.Section 2. The definitions of "board," "certification," "crane operator," "immediate supervision" and "trainee" in section 102 of the act are amended and the section is amended by adding definitions to read:Section 102. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Board." The State Board of Crane Operators and Well Drillers."Certification." Certification from the National Commission for the Certification of Crane Operators (NCCCO) or another organization found by the State Board of Crane Operators and Well Drillers to offer an equivalent testing and certification program meeting the applicable requirements of the American Society of Mechanical Engineers ASME B30.5 as relating to mobile cranes, ASME B30.3 or the requirements of ASME B30.4 as relating to tower cranes and the accreditation requirements of the National Commission for Certifying Agencies or the American National Standards Institute.20260SB1249PN1542 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *"Crane operator." An individual licensed by the State Board of Crane Operators and Well Drillers to operate a crane."Decommissioning." The process of sealing and permanently closing an inactive, abandoned or unusable water well, geotechnical well, geothermal well or environmental well.* * *"Environmental well." A cased excavation or opening into the ground created by digging, boring, drilling, driving, jetting or any other method to obtain a sample of groundwater or soil for environmental or geological investigation, research or remediation, where the depth is likely to penetrate the water table. The term includes a piezometer or observation well installed for a purpose not specified in this definition. The term does not include a well installed to provide a supply of potable water."Geotechnical well." A well drilled to collect rock and soil samples or to assess soil or rock stability for geotechnical investigations related to site analysis for construction suitability."Geothermal well." A boring or cased hole that utilizes the geothermal properties of water to provide heating or cooling through an open-loop or closed-loop groundwater heat pump system. The term does not include a boring or cased hole utilized in an electric generating geothermal system."Groundwater." Water occurring in underground streams, channels, artesian basins, reservoirs, lakes or other subsurface formations, whether percolating or otherwise."Immediate supervision." Circumstances in which [the] a crane operator or well driller is in the immediate area of [the] 20260SB1249PN1542 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 a trainee, within visual sighting distance and able to effectively communicate with the trainee."Modifying." Altering the physical construction of an existing well after initial completion, including development, redevelopment or reconditioning of an existing well."National association." The National Ground Water Association."Registered drilling company." A business entity, including a corporation, partnership, sole proprietorship, limited liability company, business trust or other association, estate, trust or foundation, which is registered with the department and employs licensed well drillers to drill or construct a well or boring."Rig." Equipment used for drilling, boring, coring, washing, jetting, driving or digging earth materials or for lifting and installing well and pump equipment."State association." The Pennsylvania Ground Water Association."Trainee." An individual who has not been issued a license under this act or obtained certification but who is authorized to operate a crane or practice well drilling as set forth in this act only when under the immediate supervision of a crane operator or well driller."Water well." An excavation or boring constructed by drilling, digging, boring, coring, washing, driving, jetting or other methods to locate, divert or acquire groundwater for purposes including human consumption, irrigation, industrial processes, heating, cooling, groundwater dewatering, investigation, monitoring, testing or remediation."Well driller." An individual licensed under this act to 20260SB1249PN1542 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 drill, dig, drive, bore, core, wash, jet, construct, alter, decommission or repair a water well, geothermal well, environmental well or geotechnical well. The term does not include an individual who drills, constructs, modifies or decommissions an oil or natural gas well regulated under 58 Pa.C.S. Ch. 32 (relating to development), the act of July 25, 1961 (P.L.825, No.359), known as the Oil and Gas Conservation Law, or the act of December 18, 1984 (P.L.1069, No.214), known as the Coal and Gas Resource Coordination Act."Well owner." An individual or entity owning land on which a well or boring is constructed, modified or decommissioned.Section 3. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 102.1. Applicability.(a) Oil and natural gas wells.--This act shall not apply to an individual who drills, constructs, modifies or decommissions an oil or natural gas well regulated under 58 Pa.C.S. Ch. 32 (relating to development), the act of July 25, 1961 (P.L.825, No.359), known as the Oil and Gas Conservation Law, or the act of December 18, 1984 (P.L.1069, No.214), known as the Coal and Gas Resource Coordination Act . (b) Normal agricultural operations.--This act shall not apply to a function performed for normal agricultural operations as defined in section 2 of the act of June 10, 1982 (P.L.454, No.133), referred to as the Right-to-Farm Law.Section 4. Chapter 3 heading and section 301(a), (b)(3), (c) introductory paragraph and (4), (f) and (g) of the act are amended and subsection (b) is amended by adding paragraphs to read:CHAPTER 3STATE BOARD OF CRANE OPERATORS AND WELL DRILLERS20260SB1249PN1542 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 301. Board.(a) Establishment.--There is hereby established the State Board of Crane Operators and Well Drillers within the department.(b) Composition.--The board shall consist of the following:* * *(3) Four professional crane operator members. Professional members shall have been actively engaged in crane-related operations in this Commonwealth for at least five years immediately preceding appointment. Except as set forth in subsection (f), professional crane operator members shall be licensed under this act as crane operators.(4) Four professional well driller members, including two water well drillers, one geotechnical well driller and one geothermal well driller, who have been actively engaged in well drilling in this Commonwealth for at least five years immediately preceding appointment and are licensed as well drillers under this act, except as provided under subsection (f).(5) The Secretary of Conservation and Natural Resources or a designee, serving as an ex officio nonvoting member.(c) Meeting.--The board shall meet within 30 days after the appointment of the initial members and within 30 days after appointment of the initial members under subsection (b)(4) and shall:* * *(4) Educate the public regarding the requirements of being licensed to operate a crane or drill a well and to hold oneself out as a crane operator or well driller in this Commonwealth.20260SB1249PN1542 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *(f) Professional members and initial appointments.--A professional member initially appointed to the board pursuant to this act need not be licensed at the time of appointment but at the time of appointment must have satisfied eligibility requirements for licensure, including holding current certification, as a crane operator or having satisfied eligibility requirements for licensure as a well driller, as provided in this act.(g) Quorum.--A majority of the members of the board shall constitute a quorum. Except for temporary and automatic suspensions under section 705, a member may not be counted as part of a quorum or vote on any issue unless the member is physically or virtually in attendance at the meeting.* * *Section 5. Section 302(1) and (5) of the act are amended to read:Section 302. Powers and duties of board.The board shall have the following powers and duties:(1) To provide for and regulate the licensing of individuals engaged in operating a crane and individuals engaged in well drilling.* * *(5) To promulgate and enforce regulations, not inconsistent with this act, as necessary only to carry into effect the provisions of this act. This paragraph includes the setting of fees and the adoption of standards for certification of crane operators and licensing of well drillers. Regulations shall be adopted in conformity with the provisions of the act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.769, No.240), 20260SB1249PN1542 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 referred to as the Commonwealth Documents Law, and the act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), known as the Regulatory Review Act.* * *Section 6. Section 501(a), (b), (c), (d), (e) heading and (g) heading of the act are amended and the section is amended by adding subsections to read:Section 501. Licensure.(a) General rule.--Except as provided in subsection (c), an individual may not operate a crane or drill a well, offer himself for employment as an individual who may operate a crane or drill a well or hold himself out as a crane operator or well driller unless licensed by the board.(b) Business entities.--Except as provided in [subsection] subsections (c) and (c.1), an individual, corporation, partnership, firm or other entity shall not employ an individual to operate a crane or drill a well or allow or direct an individual to operate a crane or drill a well unless the individual is licensed under this act.(c) [Trainee] Crane operator trainees.--For purposes of acquiring the experience necessary to obtain certification, a crane operator trainee who has passed a written examination of the National Commission for the Certification of Crane Operators or of a national association deemed equivalent by the board may operate a crane when under the immediate supervision of a crane operator. In order to qualify as a crane operator trainee under this subsection, the individual must be 18 years of age or older and have demonstrated, to the satisfaction of the person employing the crane operator, that the crane operator trainee is physically capable of operating a crane.20260SB1249PN1542 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c.1) Well driller trainees.--A well driller trainee who is not a licensed well driller may engage in well drilling only if all of the following criteria are met:(1) The well driller trainee works under the immediate supervision of a licensed well driller.(2) The licensed well driller is present at the drilling site while the well driller trainee engages in well drilling.(3) The well driller trainee is not primarily responsible for drilling or operating the drilling apparatus or rig.(4) The licensed well driller directly supervises no more than three well driller trainees at a time and is on-site while supervising.(5) The well driller trainee does not directly contract, bid, advertise or accept payment from the client for drilling.(d) Duty of crane operator and licensed well driller.--When providing immediate supervision to a trainee pursuant to subsection (c) or (c.1), the crane operator or well driller shall have no other duties.(e) [Title] Crane operator title.--* * *(e.1) Well driller title.--An individual who holds a license as a well driller, or is maintained on inactive status under section 504(b), shall have the right to use the title "licensed well driller" and the abbreviation "L.W.D." Except as provided in subsection (c.1), no other individual shall use the title "licensed well driller" or the abbreviation "L.W.D." or hold oneself out as being able to drill a well or as being authorized to drill a well.* * *20260SB1249PN1542 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (g) Specialties of crane operators.--* * *(g.1) Categories of well drillers.--(1) The board shall establish the following categories for well driller licensure:(i) Expert licensed well driller with the title "Expert L.W.D."(ii) Specialized licensed well driller with the title "Specialized L.W.D."(iii) Any other category deemed appropriate by the board.(2) A licensed well driller in a category under paragraph (1)(i) or (ii) may specialize in one or more of the following well types, subject to qualifications under section 507:(i) Water well.(ii) Geothermal well.(iii) Geotechnical well.(iv) Environmental well.Section 7. Sections 502 heading, (a) introductory paragraph, (b) and (c)(1) introductory paragraph, 504(a), 505 and 506(a) introductory paragraph of the act are amended to read:Section 502. Qualifications for licensure as crane operator.(a) General rule.--To be eligible to apply for licensure as a crane operator, an applicant must fulfill the following requirements:* * *(b) Renewal of license.--In the case of a crane operator licensee applying for renewal of license where certification will expire before the biennial renewal cycle will expire, the licensee shall submit evidence satisfactory to the board that 20260SB1249PN1542 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the licensee has renewed certification. Failure to maintain certification or to submit evidence of renewal of certification shall subject the licensee to disciplinary action. The board shall promulgate regulations setting forth the evidence necessary to demonstrate renewal of certification as provided in this subsection.(c) Convictions prohibited.--(1) The board shall not issue a crane operator license to an individual who has been convicted of a felony under the act of April 14, 1972 (P.L.233, No.64), known as The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act, or an offense under the laws of another jurisdiction which, if committed in this Commonwealth, would be a felony under The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act unless:* * *Section 504. Duration of license.(a) Duration of license.--A license issued pursuant to this act shall be on a biennial basis. The biennial expiration date shall be established by the board in consultation with the commissioner. Application for renewal of a crane operator or well driller license shall biennially be forwarded to an individual holding a current license prior to the expiration date of the current renewal biennium. The application form must indicate whether certification will expire before the biennial renewal cycle will expire.* * *Section 505. Reporting of multiple licensure.A crane operator or well driller who is also licensed to operate a crane or drill a well in any other state, territory, possession of the United States or country shall report this 20260SB1249PN1542 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 information to the board on the biennial registration application. A licensee shall report any disciplinary action taken in another state, territory, possession of the United States or country to the board on the biennial registration application or within 90 days of final disposition, whichever is sooner. Multiple licensure shall be noted by the board on the crane operator's or well driller's record, and the state, territory, possession or country shall be notified of any disciplinary actions taken by the board against the crane operator or well driller in this Commonwealth.Section 506. License without certification.(a) Eligibility.--For a period commencing on the effective date of regulations promulgated under section 2102 and continuing until December 9, 2011, an individual shall be eligible for licensure as a crane operator without certification, as required by this act, if the individual:* * *Section 8. The act is amended by adding sections to read:Section 507. Qualifications for licensure as well driller. (a) Eligibility.--To be eligible to apply for licensure as a well driller, an applicant must comply with all of the following requirements:(1) Be of good moral character.(2) Be at least 18 years of age.(3) Provide proof of bonding and liability insurance through the applicant's employer or sole proprietorship, as required by section 510.(4) Be affiliated with a registered drilling company.(5) Demonstrate proficiency in drilling techniques for the applicable licensure category and specialty by passing a 20260SB1249PN1542 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 board-approved examination under section 509, unless applying for licensure under section 508.(6) Pay the fee established by the board.(b) Renewal of license.--In the case of a well driller licensee applying for renewal of license where certification will expire before the biennial renewal cycle will expire, the licensee shall submit evidence satisfactory to the board that the licensee has renewed certification. Failure to maintain certification or submit evidence of renewal of certification shall subject the licensee to disciplinary action. The board shall promulgate regulations providing the evidence necessary to demonstrate renewal of certification as provided in this subsection.(c) Convictions prohibited.-- (1) The board shall not issue a well driller license to an individual who has been convicted of a felony under the act of April 14, 1972 (P.L.233, No.64), known as The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act, or an offense under the laws of another jurisdiction which, if committed in this Commonwealth, would be a felony under The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act unless:(i) at least ten years have elapsed from the date of conviction;(ii) the individual satisfactorily demonstrates to the board that the individual has made significant progress in personal rehabilitation since the conviction such that licensure of the individual should not be expected to create a substantial risk of harm to the health and safety of well drillers, trainees or the public or a substantial risk of further criminal 20260SB1249PN1542 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 violations; and(iii) the individual otherwise satisfies the qualifications provided in this act.(2) An individual's statement on the application declaring the absence of a conviction shall be deemed satisfactory evidence of the absence of a conviction, unlessthe board has some evidence to the contrary.Section 508. Grandfathering for well drillers.(a) Eligibility.--For the first two years after the effective date of this section, an applicant meeting the requirements under section 507 may apply for licensure without examination if the applicant demonstrates all of the following:(1) For the category of expert licensed well driller: (i) Three professional references from the drilling industry.(ii) Documentation from a drilling company verifying competency in completing at least 50,000 cumulative feet of drilling for each well type identified in section 501(g.1)(2) for which the applicant is seeking licensure within the last five years.(iii) Documentation from a drilling company verifying competency in drilling in at least three of the well types identified in section 501(g.1)(2);(2) For the category of specialized licensed well driller:(i) Three professional references from the drilling industry.(ii) Documentation from a drilling company verifying competency in completing at least 30,000 cumulative feet of drilling for the specific well type for which the 20260SB1249PN1542 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 applicant is seeking licensure within the last five years.(b) Applicability.--The provisions of this section shall not apply two years after the effective date of this section.Section 509. Examination for licensure as well driller. (a) Eligibility.--An applicant for licensure as a well driller shall meet the requirements under section 507 and any additional criteria established by the board to be eligible to take the examination for licensure as a well driller and for the board to consider the results of the examination.(b) Fees.--An applicant for licensure as a well driller shall register for the applicable examination through an authorized provider and pay the appropriate fees.(c) Required examinations.--The board will determine which examinations are applicable for each drilling technique and licensing category or specialty. Applicants are required to take the applicable examinations, as determined by the board, for consideration for licensure.(d) Results.--An applicant for licensure as a well driller shall ensure examination results are submitted to the board with the application.(e) Examinations.--The board shall designate examinations for each drilling technique, licensure category and specialty. The national association, State association or another approved entity shall administer the examinations to demonstrate proficiency in drilling methods, drilling equipment operation, well design and construction, geological formation identification, pump system operation and maintenance and other relevant skills.(f) Passing score.--An applicant for licensure as a well 20260SB1249PN1542 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 driller shall attain a passing score on the applicable examination, as determined by the board, to be eligible for licensure.Section 510. Bonding and insurance for well drillers.A well driller, as a well owner, contractor or employee of a registered drilling company, shall demonstrate that drilling operations are covered by bonding and liability insurance as established by the board. For modifications of an existing well, a well driller shall not be liable for work completed before the effective date of this section or for work completed by another driller. A well driller shall inform well owners of any structural deficiencies or conditions not meeting professional standards and industry regulations under section 512.Section 511. Continuing education for well drillers.(a) Requirement.--During each biennial renewal period, a well driller shall complete continuing education as established by the board.(b) Approved providers.--The board shall establish criteria for approved course providers based on content, instructor qualifications and recommendations from the national association and the State association.( c) Auditing.--The board shall audit licensed well drillers to verify compliance with continuing education requirements. A well driller must fully respond to audit requests by the board within 30 days of the request or as otherwise specified by the board in the request.(d) Recordkeeping.--A well driller shall maintain records verifying completion of continuing education requirements for five years after completion. In an audit or disciplinary proceeding, the board may infer from a well driller's failure to 20260SB1249PN1542 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 maintain records as required under this subsection that the well driller did not complete the required continuing education.(e) Implementation.--The board shall implement the auditing criteria under subsection (c) within two years of the effective date of this section.Section 512. Professional standards and industry regulations for well drilling.(a) Compliance.--A well driller shall comply with all applicable Federal, State and local laws and regulations.(b) Building codes.--A well driller shall adhere to relevant provisions of the Chapters 3 and 6 of the International Plumbing Code, including sections 309, 602 and 603, as adopted by Department of Labor and Industry in accordance with Chapter 3 of the act of November 10, 1999 (P.L.491, No.45), known as the Pennsylvania Construction Code Act, and 34 Pa. Code § 403.21 (relating to Uniform Construction Code).Section 513. Additional reporting requirements for well drillers.(a) Permits.--A well driller shall obtain and maintain all required permits and certifications before and during well construction or modification in accordance with Federal, State and local laws and regulations.(b) Well testing.--A well driller shall comply with well testing requirements and reporting in accordance with Federal, State and local laws and regulations.(c) Intent to drill.--Within 72 hours of entering a contract, written or oral, to drill a well, a well driller shall submit a notice of intent to drill through PaGWISDriller or another form specified by the Department of Conservation and Natural Resources, including the well owner's name and address, 20260SB1249PN1542 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the township and county where the well will be located and the approximate drilling start date. The Department of Conservation and Natural Resources shall share the notice with the department upon request.(d) Completion reports.--Within 10 days of completing a water well or geothermal well, a well driller shall submit a record through PaGWISDriller or another form specified by the Department of Conservation and Natural Resources, which includes the exact geographic location of the well and a log of the well containing a description of materials penetrated, the size and depth, the diameters and lengths of casing and screen installed, the static and pumping level, the yield and any other information pertaining to the construction or operation of the well as required by the Department of Conservation and Natural Resources. The Department of Conservation and Natural Resources shall provide access to the report to the department within 10 days of receipt of the report.(e) Decommissioning.--At least 10 days before decommissioning a well, a well driller shall submit a record through PaGWISDriller or another form specified by the Department of Conservation and Natural Resources. The board, in consultation with the Department of Conservation and Natural Resources, shall promulgate regulations for effectively sealing and decommissioning wells.(f) Modifications.--Within 10 days of modifying a well, a licensed well driller shall submit a record of the modification through PaGWISDriller or another form specified by the Department of Conservation and Natural Resources.Section 514. Sampling. (a) Core samples.--Upon receiving a notice of intent to 20260SB1249PN1542 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 drill from a well driller, the Department of Conservation and Natural Resources may request samples of core cuttings for research within two business days after receiving the notice. The Department of Conservation and Natural Resources shall provide the well driller with containers for the samples.(b) Additional testing.--The Department of Conservation and Natural Resources, in consultation with the Department of Environmental Protection and Department of Health, may recommend additional inspections or tests to ensure public safety and health, establishing protocols and thresholds accordingly.Section 515. Well driller license identification.(a) License contents.--The board shall issue each well driller a license identifying all of the following:(1) The licensee's name.(2) The licensure category and any specialty.(3) The license number.(4) The license expiration date.(b) Possession.--A well driller shall carry a valid and current license while engaging in well drilling and present the license upon request by an authorized official.Section 516. Drilling company and rig registration.(a) Company registration.--A drilling company shall register with the board and employ or contract only with well drillers licensed to conduct well drilling in this Commonwealth.(b) Rig registration.--A drilling company shall register and title each rig with the Department of Transportation in accordance with 75 Pa.C.S. Chs. 11 (relating to certificate of title and security interests ) and 49 (relating to size, weight and load).(c) Rig possession.--A well driller shall possess the rig 20260SB1249PN1542 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 registration while rig is in operation.Section 517. Exemptions.A well driller designated as a prequalified geotechnical drilling contractor under the Department of Transportation's Publication 222, Geotechnical Investigation Manual, shall be exempt from geotechnical well driller licensure requirements for work contracted by the Department of Transportation to specifically drill geotechnical wells or borings.Section 518. Agricultural operations.Nothing in this act shall be construed to apply to functions performed for normal agricultural operations as defined in section 2 of the act of June 10, 1982 (P.L.454, No.133), referred to as the Right-to-Farm Law.Section 9. Section 702(b)(1), (2) and (3) of the act are amended to read:Section 702. Violation of act.* * *(b) Civil penalty.--In addition to any other civil remedy or criminal penalty provided for in this act, the board, by a vote of the majority of the maximum number of the authorized membership of the board as provided by law or by a vote of the majority of the duly qualified and confirmed membership or a minimum of five members, whichever is greater, may levy a civil penalty of up to $1,000 on any of the following:(1) A crane operator or well driller who violates a provision of this act.(2) An individual who operates a crane or drills a well in violation of this act.(3) An individual who holds himself out as a crane operator or well driller without being properly licensed as 20260SB1249PN1542 - 20 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 provided in this act. This paragraph shall not apply to a trainee under section 501(c).* * *Section 10. Section 703(a)(1), (2), (4)(i), (7) and (10) and (b) introductory paragraph of the act are amended and subsection (a) is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 703. Refusal, suspension or revocation of license.(a) General rule.--The board may refuse, suspend or revoke a license in a case where the board finds:(1) The licensee is negligent or incompetent in operating a crane or drilling a well.(2) The licensee is unable to operate a crane or drill a well with reasonable skill and safety by reason of mental or physical illness or condition or physiological or psychological dependence upon alcohol, hallucinogenic or narcotic drugs or other drugs which tend to impair judgment or coordination, so long as such dependence shall continue. In enforcing this paragraph, the board shall, upon probable cause, have authority to compel a licensee to submit to a mental or physical examination as designated by the board. After notice, hearing, adjudication and appeal failure of a licensee to submit to such examination when directed shall constitute an admission of the allegations unless failure is due to circumstances beyond the licensee's control, consequent upon which a default and final order may be entered without the taking of testimony or presentation of evidence. A licensee affected under this paragraph shall at reasonable intervals be afforded the opportunity to demonstrate that the licensee can resume competent, safe and skillful operation of a crane or drilling of a well.20260SB1249PN1542 - 21 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *(4) The licensee has committed fraud or deceit in:(i) the operation of a crane or the drilling of a well; or* * *(7) With respect to the operation of a crane or the drilling of a well, the licensee has acted in such a manner as to present an immediate and clear danger to health, safety or property.* * *(10) The licensee falsely advertised or made misleading, deceptive, untrue or fraudulent material representations regarding licensure, certification or operation of a crane or the drilling of a well.(11) The well driller licensee has failed to comply with relevant provisions of Chapters 3 and 6 of the International Plumbing Code, including sections 309, 602 and 603, as adopted by the Department of Labor and Industry in accordance with Chapter 3 of the act of November 10, 1999 (P.L.491, No.45), known as the Pennsylvania Construction Code Act, and 34 Pa. Code § 403.21 (relating to Uniform Construction Code). (b) Acts authorized.--When the board finds that the license of crane operator or well driller may be refused, revoked or suspended pursuant to subsection (a), the board may:* * *Section 11. Section 705 of the act is amended to read:Section 705. Temporary and automatic suspensions.(a) General rule.--A license issued under this act may be temporarily suspended under circumstances determined by the board to be an immediate and clear danger to public health or 20260SB1249PN1542 - 22 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 safety. The board shall issue an order to that effect without a hearing, but upon due notice, to the licensee concerned at the licensee's last known address, which shall include a written statement of all allegations against the licensee. The provisions of section 704 shall not apply to temporary suspension. Formal action to suspend, revoke or restrict the license of the crane operator or well driller shall be commenced as otherwise provided for in this act. All actions shall be taken promptly and without delay. Within 30 days following the issuance of an order temporarily suspending a license, the board shall conduct or cause to be conducted a preliminary hearing to determine that there is a prima facie case supporting the suspension. The crane operator or well driller whose license has been temporarily suspended may be present at the preliminary hearing and may be represented by counsel, cross-examine witnesses, inspect physical evidence, call witnesses, offer evidence and testimony and make a record of the proceedings. If it is determined that there is not a prima facie case, the suspended license shall be immediately restored. The temporary suspension shall remain in effect until vacated by the board, but in no event longer than 180 days.(b) Commitment of crane operator or well driller.--A license issued under this act shall automatically be suspended upon the legal commitment of a crane operator or well driller to an institution because of mental incompetency from any cause upon filing with the board a certified copy of such commitment, conviction of a felony under the act of April 14, 1972 (P.L.233, No.64), known as The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act, or conviction of an offense under the laws of another jurisdiction, which, if committed in Pennsylvania, would 20260SB1249PN1542 - 23 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 be a felony under The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act. Automatic suspension under this subsection shall not be stayed pending an appeal of a conviction. Restoration of the license shall be made as provided in the case of revocation or suspension of a license.Section 12. Repeals are as follows:(1) The General Assembly declares that the repeal under paragraph (2) is necessary to effectuate this act.(2) The act of May 29, 1956 (1955 P.L.1840, No.610), known as the Water Well Drillers License Act, is repealed.Section 13. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1249PN1542 - 24 - 1234567891011